Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5345YC (2) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 707.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 707.7 Feticide. 3 1. Any person who intentionally terminates a human 4 pregnancy, with the knowledge and voluntary consent of the 5 pregnant person female , after the end of the second trimester 6 of the pregnancy where resulting in the death of the fetus 7 results commits feticide. Feticide is a class âCâ felony. 8 2. Any person who attempts to intentionally terminate a 9 human pregnancy, with the knowledge and voluntary consent 10 of the pregnant person female , after the end of the second 11 trimester of the pregnancy where that does not result in the 12 death of the fetus does not result commits attempted feticide. 13 Attempted feticide is a class âDâ felony. 14 3. Any person who terminates a human pregnancy, with the 15 knowledge and voluntary consent of the pregnant person female , 16 who is not a person licensed to practice medicine and surgery 17 or osteopathic medicine and surgery under the provisions of 18 chapter 148 , commits a class âCâ felony. 19 4. This section shall not apply to the termination of a 20 human pregnancy performed by a physician licensed in this state 21 to practice medicine or surgery or osteopathic medicine or 22 surgery when in the best clinical judgment of the physician the 23 termination is performed to preserve the life or health of the 24 pregnant person female or of the fetus and every reasonable 25 medical effort not inconsistent with preserving the life of the 26 pregnant person female is made to preserve the life of a viable 27 fetus. 28 Sec. 2. Section 707.8, subsections 1, 2, 3, 5, and 7, Code 29 2026, are amended to read as follows: 30 1. A person who terminates a human pregnancy without the 31 consent of the pregnant person female during the commission of 32 a forcible felony is guilty of a class âBâ felony. 33 2. A person who terminates a human pregnancy without the 34 consent of the pregnant person female during the commission of 35 -1- LSB 5345YC (2) 91 as/js 1/ 3 H.F. _____ a felony or felonious assault is guilty of a class âCâ felony. 1 3. a. A person who intentionally terminates a human 2 pregnancy without the knowledge and voluntary consent of the 3 pregnant person female is guilty of a class âCâ felony. 4 b. A person who attempts to intentionally terminate a human 5 pregnancy without the knowledge and voluntary consent of the 6 pregnant person female is guilty of a class âDâ felony. 7 5. A person who by force or intimidation procures the 8 consent of the pregnant person female to a termination of a 9 human pregnancy is guilty of a class âCâ felony. 10 7. A person who unintentionally terminates a human 11 pregnancy without the knowledge and voluntary consent of the 12 pregnant person female by the commission of an act in a manner 13 likely to cause the termination of or serious injury to a human 14 pregnancy is guilty of an aggravated misdemeanor. 15 Sec. 3. Section 707.8, subsection 12, paragraphs a and b, 16 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 17 a. An act or omission of the pregnant person female . 18 b. A termination of or a serious injury to a pregnancy 19 which that is caused by the performance of an approved medical 20 procedure performed by a person licensed in this state to 21 practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and 22 surgery, irrespective of the duration of the pregnancy and with 23 or without the voluntary consent of the pregnant person female 24 when circumstances preclude the pregnant person female from 25 providing consent. 26 Sec. 4. Section 708.2, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 4. A person who commits a violation of subsection 3 against 29 another person who the person knows or reasonably should know 30 is a pregnant person female is guilty of a class âDâ felony. 31